st.dic
agneau·elle/la  # po:nom
agressif·ve/fv  # po:adj
aigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
ambigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
améliorateur·rice/ri  # po:adj
appauvrissant·e/_e  # po:adj
archiépiscopal·e/al  # po:adj
argileux·euse/xz  # po:adj
attentif·ve/fv  # po:adj
automoteur·rice/ri  # po:nom po:adj
autoroutier·ère/rr  # po:adj
avoir/zA  # po:v0ait____a
ayatollah/_s  # po:nom is:mas
barde·sse/ss  # po:nom
barlong·ue/gu  # po:adj
basochien·ne/ll  # po:adj
beau·elle/la  # po:nom po:adj
bégu·ue/ue  # po:adj
berceau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
bigouden·ène/en  # po:nom po:adj
blaireau·elle/la  # po:nom
blanc·que/qc  # po:nom po:adj
blasonneur·euse/rs  # po:nom
bloquant·e/_e  # po:adj
bougre·sse/ss  # po:nom
boulevardier·ère/rr  # po:nom po:adj
bref·ève/ev  # po:nom po:adj
bruineux·euse/xz  # po:adj
bushman/GB  # po:nom is:mas
caduc·que/qc  # po:adj
calier·ère/rr  # po:nom
caniveau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
canzone/LT  # po:nom is:fem
cardial·e/al  # po:adj
centaure·sse/ss  # po:nom
chaînier·ère/rr  # po:nom
chauffoir/_s  # po:nom is:mas
chrétien·ne/ll  # po:nom po:adj
circonciseur·euse/rs  # po:nom
cléché·e/_e  # po:adj
columbarium/LT  # po:nom is:mas
communicatif·ve/fv  # po:adj
comte·sse/ss  # po:nom
concret·ète/et  # po:adj
conneau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
consommateur·rice/ri  # po:nom po:adj
contigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
contreproductif·ve/fv  # po:adj
corticospinal·e/al  # po:adj
couenneux·euse/xz  # po:adj
crash/GB  # po:nom is:mas
culottier·ère/rr  # po:nom
damné·e/_e  # po:nom
délainage/_s  # po:nom is:mas
dénigreur·euse/rs  # po:nom
déréel·le/ll  # po:adj
desideratum/LT  # po:nom is:mas
désuet·ète/et  # po:adj
détecteur·rice/ri  # po:adj
discret·ète/et  # po:nom po:adj
dissipatif·ve/fv  # po:adj
doux·ce/xc  # po:nom po:adj
drôle·sse/ss  # po:nom
écheveau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
éluvial·e/al  # po:adj
enlumineur·euse/rs  # po:nom
estagnon/_s  # po:nom is:mas
être/zE  # po:v0ei_____a
exigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
expansé·e/_e  # po:adj
extincteur·rice/ri  # po:nom po:adj
faux·sse/xs  # po:nom po:adj
ferrugineux·euse/xz  # po:adj
figuratif·ve/fv  # po:nom po:adj
fléau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
foramen/LT  # po:nom is:mas
fordien·ne/ll  # po:adj
foulonnier·ère/rr  # po:nom
fou·olle/lu  # po:nom po:adj
galopeur·euse/rs  # po:nom po:adj
gentleman/GB  # po:nom is:mas
glénoïdal·e/al  # po:adj
gonze·sse/ss  # po:nom
grec·que/qc  # po:nom po:adj
grigneux·euse/xz  # po:adj
hachereau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
halographie/_s  # po:nom is:fem
immatériel·le/ll  # po:adj
inaccoutumé·e/_e  # po:adj
incomplet·ète/et  # po:nom po:adj
indiscret·ète/et  # po:nom po:adj
inhibiteur·rice/ri  # po:nom po:adj
inquiet·ète/et  # po:adj
intercostal·e/al  # po:adj
interprétatif·ve/fv  # po:adj
jumeau·elle/la  # po:nom po:adj
justicier·ère/rr  # po:nom po:adj
kilotonne/_s  # po:nom is:fem
lady/GB  # po:nom is:fem
lépreux·euse/xz  # po:nom po:adj
levageur·euse/rs  # po:nom
liteau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
logisticien·ne/ll  # po:nom
long·ue/gu  # po:adj
machinal·e/al  # po:adj
mafioso/LT  # po:nom is:mas
méchant·e/_e  # po:nom po:adj
mire·sse/ss  # po:nom
moniteur·rice/ri  # po:nom
motoneigiste/_s  # po:nom is:epi
mou·olle/lu  # po:adj
moutonnier·ère/rr  # po:nom po:adj
multinational·e/al  # po:adj
museau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
myxœdémateux·euse/xz  # po:adj
namibien·ne/ll  # po:nom po:adj
néogrec·que/qc  # po:adj
nouveau·elle/la  # po:nom po:adj
oblong·ue/gu  # po:adj
oestroprogestati/fv__
paddy/GB  # po:nom is:mas
pagus/LT  # po:nom is:mas
parapublic·que/qc  # po:adj
pastilleur·euse/rs  # po:nom
pelvien·ne/ll  # po:adj
perruque/_s  # po:nom is:fem
piqueux·euse/xz  # po:nom po:adj
pizzaiolo/LT  # po:nom is:mas
plombant·e/_e  # po:adj
poète·sse/ee  # po:nom
postcolonial·e/al  # po:adj
potinier·ère/rr  # po:nom po:adj
précepteur·rice/ri  # po:nom
préfet·ète/et  # po:nom
prêtre·sse/ss  # po:nom
prophète·sse/ee  # po:nom
public·que/qc  # po:adj
puceau·elle/la  # po:nom po:adj
purgatif·ve/fv  # po:adj
quiet·ète/et  # po:adj
ramereau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
raseur·euse/rs  # po:nom
reboutement/_s  # po:nom is:mas
recordman/GB  # po:nom is:mas
rémunérateur·rice/ri  # po:adj
replet·ète/et  # po:adj
sablonneux·euse/xz  # po:adj
scriptorium/LT  # po:nom is:mas
sec·que/qc  # po:nom po:adj
secret·ète/et  # po:nom po:adj
sentiente·e/_e  # po:nom po:adj
slash/GB  # po:nom is:mas
sommatif·ve/fv  # po:adj
songeur·euse/rs  # po:nom po:adj
spirituel·le/ll  # po:adj
stadiaire/_s  # po:nom po:adj is:epi
subaigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
subnormal·e/al  # po:adj
sucrier·ère/rr  # po:nom po:adj
suraigu·ue/ue  # po:adj
tabulateur·rice/ri  # po:nom
taximan/GB  # po:nom is:mas
tellureux·euse/xz  # po:adj
toccata/LT  # po:nom is:fem
tourangeau·elle/la  # po:nom po:adj
tourtereau·elle/la  # po:nom
trijumeau·elle/la  # po:nom
turc·que/qc  # po:nom po:adj
tuyau/_x  # po:nom is:mas
vicomte·sse/ss  # po:nom
vieux·eille/xl  # po:nom po:adj
volatil·e/_e  # po:adj
yachtman/GB  # po:nom is:mas
zappeur·euse/rs  # po:nom
